ru: Материал усиления отверстий страза: Металлический люверс; Металлическая оправа с отверстиями; Литое пластиковое усиление; Нет; Другое
nl: Strass gatversteviging materiaal: Metalen oogje; Metalen zetting met gaatjes; Gegoten plastic versterking; Geen; Overig
lt-LT: Akutės skylutės sutvirtinimo medžiaga: Metalinė įvorė; Metalinis įtvaras su skylutėmis; Formuoto plastiko sutvirtinimas; Nėra; Kita
da: Rhinstenshullers forstærkende materiale: Metalsnørering; Metalindfatning med huller; Støbt plastforstærkning; Ingen; Andet
nb: Forsterkningsmateriale for hull i rhinstein: Metallmalje; Metallinnfatning med hull; Støpt plastforsterkning; Ingen; Annet
ja: ラインストーン穴補強材: 金属グロメット; 穴あき金属セッティング; 成形プラスチック補強; なし; その他
zh-TW: 水鑽孔洞加固材質: 金屬墊圈; 帶孔金屬底座; 模製塑膠加固; 無; 其他
pt-BR: Strass material de reforço dos furos: Ilhós de metal; Engaste de metal com furos; Reforço de plástico moldado; Nenhum; Outro
sl-SI: Material za ojačitev luknjice za kristalčke: Kovinska obroba (zakovica); Kovinsko okovje z luknjami; Ojačitev iz oblikovane plastike; Brez; Drugo
fr: Matériau du renfort des trous du strass: Œillet métallique; Sertissage en métal à trous; Renfort en plastique moulé; Aucun; Autre
pt-PT: Material de reforço dos orifícios do strass: Ilhó de metal; Armação de metal com furos; Reforço de plástico moldado; Nenhum; Outro
ro-RO: Material de ranforsare a găurii strasului: Ochet metalic; Montură metalică cu găuri; Armătură din plastic turnat; Fără; Altele
en: Rhinestone hole reinforcement material: Metal grommet; Metal setting with holes; Molded plastic reinforcement; None; Other
el: Υλικό ενίσχυσης της οπής του στρας: Μεταλλικό μπουντούζι; Μεταλλικό δέσιμο με τρύπες; Χυτή πλαστική ενίσχυση; Κανένα; Άλλο
cs: Materiál výztuhy otvorů pro štrasové kameny: Kovová průchodka; Kovové lůžko s otvory; Lisovaná plastová výztuž; Žádný; Jiné
bg-BG: Материал за укрепване на отвора на кристала: Метален капсул; Метален обков с отвори; Отлято пластмасово подсилване; Няма; Други
es: Material de refuerzo para agujeros de diamantes de imitación: Ojal de metal; Engaste de metal con orificios; Refuerzo de plástico moldeado; Ninguno; Otro
vi: Vật liệu gia cố lỗ đính đá: Khoen kim loại; Đế kim loại có lỗ đính; Gia cố nhựa đúc; Không; Khác
sk-SK: Materiál na výstuž otvorov kamienkov: Kovová priechodka; Kovové osadenie s otvormi; Tvarovaná plastová výstuž; Žiadne; Iné
zh-CN: 水钻孔眼加固材料: 金属孔眼; 带孔金属底座; 模制塑料加固件; 无; 其他
hr-HR: Materijal za ojačanje rupe kristala: Metalna ušica; Metalni okvir s rupama; Ojačanje od lijevane plastike; Bez; Ostalo
th: วัสดุเสริมความแข็งแรงสำหรับรูพลอยเทียม: ตาไก่โลหะ; ขอบฝังโลหะมีรู; เสริมความแข็งแรงด้วยพลาสติกขึ้นรูป; ไม่มี; อื่นๆ
tr: Yapay elmas delik güçlendirme malzemesi: Metal kuşgözü; Delikli metal yuva; Kalıplı plastik güçlendirme; Yok; Diğer
hu: Strasszkő furaterősítő anyaga: Fém ringli; Lyukacsos fém foglalat; Formázott műanyag megerősítés; Nincs; Egyéb
sv: Förstärkningsmaterial för strasshål: Metallöglett; Metallfattning med hål; Gjuten plastförstärkning; Ingen; Annat
fi: Tekojalokiven kolon vahvistusmateriaali: Metallipurjengas; Reiällinen metalli-istukka; Valettu muovivahvike; Ei mitään; Muu
de: Material der Strasslochverstärkung: Metallöse; Metallfassung mit Löchern; Geformte Kunststoffverstärkung; Keine; Sonstiges
ko: 라인스톤 구멍 보강 소재: 금속 그로밋; 구멍이 있는 금속 세팅; 성형 플라스틱 보강재; 없음; 기타
pl: Materiał wzmacniający otwory z kryształkami: Metalowy przelotek; Metalowa oprawa z otworami; Formowane wzmocnienie z tworzywa sztucznego; Brak; Inne
it: Materiale di rinforzo per fori di strass: Occhiello in metallo; Incastonatura in metallo con fori; Rinforzo in plastica sagomata; Nessuno; Altro